Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 2.1 Special Police for Private Institutions

12-2.1-1.
Appointment of special police.

The superintendent of state police, upon the petition of a private college, university, junior college, or other private educational institution of higher learning located in this state, may from time to time appoint qualified employees of those institutions as special police officers. The petition shall contain the name, address, qualifications, and personal history of the person for whom appointment is requested. Any person so appointed must have satisfactorily completed the established course of training in the police training school as established in this state. Following appointment, the person shall hold office as a special police officer until: (1) his or her appointment is revoked by the superintendent of state police; (2) until the petitioning institution shall file written notice with the superintendent that the designation of the person as a special police officer should be revoked; or (3) until his or her employment with the petitioning institution is terminated. Upon appointment of a special police officer, the superintendent shall issue to the person a license to act as a special police officer and the license shall, in the courts of this state, be evidence of the validity of the appointment of the person named in it and of his or her authority to act as a special police officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 194, § 1.

12-2.1-2.
Powers of special police officers.

Upon issuance of a license under §

12-2.1-1

, the person so designated as a special police officer shall have the same immunities and may exercise, in and upon the lands and buildings of the institution by which he or she is employed, and upon streets and highways immediately adjacent to those lands, the same powers and authority of a police officer as are conferred by the laws of this state upon members of the division of state police, including the power to arrest persons for violation of state criminal statutes or for violation of city or town ordinances of the city or town in which the institution is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 194, § 1.

12-2.1-3.
Record of appointments.

A record of all appointments under this chapter shall be kept in the division of state police and shall be open to public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 194, § 1.

12-2.1-4.
Badges.

Any special police officer appointed under this chapter shall, when on duty and in uniform, wear in plain sight a metallic badge, inscribed with the words “college police,” “university police”, or “campus police” and the name or initials of the institution by which he or she is employed. When not in uniform, the officer must carry his or her badge on his or her person while on duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 194, § 1.

12-2.1-5.
Continuing powers of state and local police.

Appointment of special police officers under this chapter shall in no way limit the powers, authority, and responsibility of state police and police of the various cities and towns to enforce state law and municipal ordinances on property owned by the educational institutions employing the special police officers. The division of state police and city and town police shall assist the special police officers in matters relating to the detention and arraignment of prisoners for court. The special police officers shall submit reports concerning an arrest to the department processing the arrest, whether the division of state police or the police in the city or town in which the educational institution is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 194, § 1.

12-2.1-6.
Reciprocity.

Any individual who has been appointed as a police officer in a sister state or one of its municipalities and who has satisfactorily completed a required course of police officer training recognized and certified by the sister state may apply, in writing, to the superintendent of state police for a certificate to the effect that the applicant has completed a course of training equivalent to that required under §

12-2.1-1

. The application may be granted in whole or in part or denied. If granted in part, the exact extent of both any waiver of training and the training yet to be satisfactorily completed shall be set forth in full. The certification shall be granted only if the superintendent determines that the course of training previously taken, together with the satisfactory completion of any training not waived, is in compliance with and equivalent to the training required by §

12-2.1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 142, § 1.